Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.02, is amended to read: 611A.02 NOTIFICATION OF VICTIM SERVICES AND VICTIMS' RIGHTS. Subd. 2. Victims' rights. (a) The Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall update the two model notices of the rights of crime victimsnew text begin required to be distributed under this section and section 629.341new text end . (b) The initial notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by a peace officer to each victim, as defined in section 611A.01, at the time of initial contact with the victimnew text begin at the scene or when the victim makes a reportnew text end . The noticenew text begin , which can be distributed as a document or electronically,new text end must inform a victim of: (1) the victim's right to apply deleted text begin for reparationsdeleted text end new text begin to the Minnesota Crime Victims Reimbursement Programnew text end to cover losses, not including property losses, resulting from a violent crime deleted text begin and the telephone number to call to request an applicationdeleted text end new text begin and information on how to applynew text end ; (2) the victim's right to request that the law enforcement agency withhold public access to data revealing the victim's identity under section 13.82, subdivision 17, paragraph (d); (3) the additional rights of domestic abuse victims as described in section 629.341; (4) information on new text begin statewide crime victim help lines and new text end the nearest crime victim assistance program or resource;new text begin andnew text end (5) the deleted text begin victim's rights, if an offender is charged, to be informed of and participate in the prosecution process, including the right to request restitution; anddeleted text end new text begin right to be notified if an offender is charged, to participate in the prosecution process, and to request restitution upon conviction.new text end deleted text begin (6)deleted text end new text begin (c) A supplemental notice must be distributed by law enforcement agenciesnew text end in homicide casesdeleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin and must include resources and information specific to homicide victims andnew text end information on rights and procedures available under sections 524.2-803, 524.3-614, and 524.3-615. deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (d)new text end A supplemental notice of the rights of crime victims must be distributed by the city or county attorney's office to each victimdeleted text begin ,deleted text end within a reasonable time after the offender is charged or petitioned. This notice must inform a victim of all the rights of crime victims under this chapter. Subd. 3. Notice of rights of victims in juvenile court. deleted text begin (a) The Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety shall update the notice of the rights of victims in juvenile court that explainsdeleted text end new text begin A supplemental notice shall be distributed by the prosecutor's office to each victim of an offense committed by a juvenile within a reasonable time after the petition is filed. This notice must notify the victim ofnew text end : (1) the rights of victims in the juvenile court; (2) when a juvenile matter is public; (3) the procedures to be followed in juvenile court proceedings; deleted text begin anddeleted text end new text begin (4) the right to attend certain juvenile court proceedings; new text end new text begin (5) the information related to the juvenile case that is available to victims; and new text end deleted text begin (4)deleted text end new text begin (6)new text end other relevant matters. deleted text begin (b) The juvenile court shall distribute a copy of the notice to each victim of juvenile crime who attends a juvenile court proceeding, along with a notice of services for victims available in that judicial district. deleted text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 611A.0315, is amended to read: 611A.0315 VICTIM NOTIFICATION; DOMESTIC ASSAULT; CRIMINAL SEXUAL CONDUCT; HARASSMENT; STALKING. Subdivision 1. Notice of decision not to prosecute. (a) A prosecutor shall make every reasonable effort to notify a victim of domestic assault, a criminal sexual conduct offense, deleted text begin ordeleted text end harassment or stalkingnew text begin , a violation of an order for protection, domestic abuse no contact order, or harassment restraining ordernew text end that the prosecutor has decided to decline prosecution of the case or to dismiss the criminal charges filed against the defendant. Efforts to notify the victim should include, in order of priority: (1) contacting the victim or a person designated by the victim by telephone; and (2) contacting the victim by new text begin email or new text end mail. If a suspect is still in custody, deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin a telephone or emailnew text end notification attempt shall be made before the suspect is released from custody. (b) Whenever a prosecutor dismisses criminal charges against a person accused of domestic assault, a criminal sexual conduct offense, deleted text begin ordeleted text end harassment or stalking, new text begin a violation of an order for protection, or a violation of a harassment restraining order, new text end a record shall be made of the specific reasons for the dismissal. If the dismissal is due to the unavailability of the witness, the prosecutor shall indicate the specific reason that the witness is unavailable. (c) Whenever a prosecutor notifies a victim of domestic assault, criminal sexual conduct, or harassment or stalking under this section, the prosecutor shall also inform the victim of the method and benefits of seeking an order for protection under section 518B.01 or a restraining order under section 609.748 and that the victim may seek an order without paying a fee. Subd. 2. Definitions. For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given them. (a) "Assault" has the meaning given it in section 609.02, subdivision 10. (b) "Domestic assault" means an assault committed by the actor against a family or household member. (c) "Family or household member" has the meaning given it in section 518B.01, subdivision 2. (d) "Harassment" or "stalking" means a violation of section 609.749. (e) "Criminal sexual conduct offense" means a violation of sections 609.342 to 609.3453. new text begin (f) "Violation of an order for protection" has the meaning given in section 518B.01, subdivision 14. new text end new text begin (g) "Violation of a harassment restraining order" has the meaning given in section 609.748, subdivision 6. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 629.341, subdivision 3, is amended to read: Subd. 3. Notice of rights. The peace officer shall deleted text begin telldeleted text end new text begin orally notifynew text end the victim deleted text begin whether adeleted text end new text begin aboutnew text end shelter or other services deleted text begin aredeleted text end available in the community and give the victim immediate new text begin written new text end notice of the legal deleted text begin rights anddeleted text end remedies new text begin and resources new text end available. The new text begin written new text end notice must include deleted text begin furnishing the victim a copy ofdeleted text end the following statement: deleted text begin "IF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can ask the city or county attorney to file a criminal complaint. You also have the right to go to court and file a petition requesting an order for protection from domestic abuse. The order could include the following: deleted text end deleted text begin (1) an order restraining the abuser from further acts of abuse; deleted text end deleted text begin (2) an order directing the abuser to leave your household; deleted text end deleted text begin (3) an order preventing the abuser from entering your residence, school, business, or place of employment; deleted text end deleted text begin (4) an order awarding you or the other parent custody of or parenting time with your minor child or children; or deleted text end deleted text begin (5) an order directing the abuser to pay support to you and the minor children if the abuser has a legal obligation to do so." deleted text end new text begin "IF YOU ARE A VICTIM OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE, you can file a petition with the court for an order for protection and ask that the person responsible for the domestic violence: new text end new text begin (1) Be restrained from further acts of abuse; new text end new text begin (2) Leave your household; new text end new text begin (3) Stay away from your residence, school, business, or place of employment; and new text end new text begin (4) Pay temporary support to you and for the minor child if the person is legally obligated to do so. new text end new text begin In your petition, you can request a custody and parenting time order for a child in common with the person." new text end The notice must include the deleted text begin resource listing, including telephone number, for the area program that providesdeleted text end new text begin statewide domestic abuse help line and contact information for area organizations providingnew text end services to victims of domestic abuse as deleted text begin shelter,deleted text end designated by the Office of Justice Programs in the Department of Public Safety. Sec. 4. new text begin USE OF EXISTING SUPPLY.new text end new text begin A law enforcement agency, city attorney's office, or county attorney's office may exhaust existing notices before producing materials with the modifications required under Minnesota Statutes, sections 611A.02, subdivision 2, and 629.341, subdivision 3. new text end